Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-254
Interfering with waterworks; taking water without authority; penalty.

Any person owning or in control of any ditch, reservoir, or other device for appropriating or using water who willfully opens, closes, changes, or interferes with any headgate or controlling gate, or by any method or means takes any water from any natural stream, reservoir, or other source, through any ditch or canal to any land or lands, or allows the same to be done, or uses or allows to be used any water upon any land or lands, or for any other purpose whatsoever, without authority from the Chief Water Officer, or who stores water in or releases water from a reservoir other than in compliance with orders of the Chief Water Officer, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day that the water is allowed to run without authority from the Chief Water Officer shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 10, p. 849;

C.S.1922, § 8460;

C.S.1929, § 46-610;

R.S.1943, § 46-254;

Laws 1973, LB 186, § 9;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 257;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 119;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 101.

Drover of livestock, duty to prevent damages, see section 54-305.